District of Columbia statutes.
50-2706

Rulemaking.

The Mayor, or designee, is authorized, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, to promulgate, amend, or repeal rules and to establish or modify cost-based fees to implement the provisions of this chapter.

June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-139, § 7, 53 DCR 3682